apertium-es-gl.gl.dix
<pardef n="ro/mper__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>mperiamos</l> <r>mper<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>mperiámo</l>  <r>mper<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__haberiámo"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>mperiámos</l> <r>mper<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__haberiámos"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>mperiámo</l>  <r>mper<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__haberiámos_1"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>mpería</l>    <r>mper<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>mpería</l>    <r>mper<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__habería"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>mperiades</l> <r>mper<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>mperiáde</l>  <r>mper<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__haberiámo"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>mperiádes</l> <r>mper<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__haberiámos"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>mperías</l>   <r>mper<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>mpería</l>    <r>mper<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__haberiámo"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>mperías</l>   <r>mper<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__haberiámos"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>mperían</l>   <r>mper<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>mperían</l>   <r>mper<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__haberían"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>mpería</l>    <r>mper<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>mpería</l>    <r>mper<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__haberían"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>mperemos</l>  <r>mper<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>mperémo</l>   <r>mper<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__haberiámo"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>mperémos</l>  <r>mper<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__haberiámos2"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>mperémo</l>   <r>mper<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__haberiámos_1"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>mperei</l>    <r>mper<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>mperei</l>    <r>mper<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__haberei_a"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>mperéi</l>    <r>mper<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__haberei_b"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>mperedes</l>  <r>mper<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>mperéde</l>   <r>mper<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__haberiámo"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>mperédes</l>  <r>mper<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__haberiámos"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>mperás</l>    <r>mper<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>mpera</l>     <r>mper<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__haberiámo"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>mperas</l>    <r>mper<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__haberiámos_a"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>mperás</l>    <r>mper<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__haberiámos_b"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>mperán</l>    <r>mper<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>mperan</l>    <r>mper<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__haberían_a"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>mperán</l>    <r>mper<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__haberían_b"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>mperá</l>     <r>mper<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>mpera</l>     <r>mper<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__haberían_a"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>mperá</l>     <r>mper<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__haberían_b"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>mpermos</l>   <r>mper<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>mpérmo</l>    <r>mper<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__haberiámo"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>mpérmos</l>   <r>mper<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__haberiámos"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>mpérmo</l>    <r>mper<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__haberiámos_1"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>mper</l>      <r>mper<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>mpe</l>       <r>mper<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__haberiámo"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>mper</l>      <r>mper<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__haberiámos_a"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>mpér</l>      <r>mper<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__haberiámos_b"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>mperdes</l>   <r>mper<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>mpérde</l>    <r>mper<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__haberiámo"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>mpérdes</l>   <r>mper<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__haberiámos"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>mperes</l>    <r>mper<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>mpére</l>     <r>mper<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__haberiámo"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>mpéres</l>    <r>mper<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__haberiámos"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>mperen</l>    <r>mper<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>mpéren</l>    <r>mper<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__haberían"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>mper</l>      <r>mper<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>mpe</l>       <r>mper<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__haberiámo"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>mper</l>      <r>mper<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__houber_a"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>mpér</l>      <r>mper<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__houber_b"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>mpendo</l>    <r>mper<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>mpéndo</l>    <r>mper<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__haberían"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>mpéndomos</l> <r>mper<s n="vblex"/><s n="gerps"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>mpéndomo</l>  <r>mper<s n="vblex"/><s n="gerps"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__haberiámo"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>mpéndomos</l> <r>mper<s n="vblex"/><s n="gerps"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__haberiámos"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>mpéndomo</l>  <r>mper<s n="vblex"/><s n="gerps"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__haberiámos_1"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>mpéndodes</l> <r>mper<s n="vblex"/><s n="gerps"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>mpéndode</l>  <r>mper<s n="vblex"/><s n="gerps"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__haberiámo"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>mpéndodes</l> <r>mper<s n="vblex"/><s n="gerps"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__haberiámos"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>mpemos</l>    <r>mper<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>mpémo</l>     <r>mper<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__haberiámo"/></e>

<e lm="romper"><i>ro</i><par n="ro/mper__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="romper a serie"><i>ro</i><par n="ro/mper__vblex"/><p><l><b/>a<b/>serie</l><r><g><b/>a<b/>serie</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="romper unha serie"><i>ro</i><par n="ro/mper__vblex"/><p><l><b/>unha<b/>serie</l><r><g><b/>unha<b/>serie</g></r></p></e>
